District of Columbia statutes.
29-411.09

Notice to Attorney General.

The plaintiff in a derivative proceeding shall notify the Attorney General for the District of Columbia within 10 days after commencing the proceeding if it involves a charitable corporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720